Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3204
Rules applicable to computation of limitation period.

If the statute of limitations of another state applies to the assertion of a claim in this state, the other state’s relevant statutes and other rules of law governing tolling and accrual apply in computing the limitation period, but its statutes and other rules of law governing conflict of laws do not apply.

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 4.